Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.030

Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of the remainder of this chapter shall not be applied to cities of the first class nor to borrowing money and issuing bonds by any city or town for the purpose of supplying it with water, artificial light, or sewers if the works for supplying the water, artificial light, or sewers are to be owned and controlled by the city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.37.030. Prior: (i) 1891 c 128 s 10; RRS s 9548. (ii) 1891 c 128 s 11; RRS s 9549.]